Arkansas, session 2025, SB166.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 19-11-233(b)(2), concerning emergency
procurements under the Arkansas Procurement Law, is amended to read as
follows:
(2) As used in this subsection, “critical emergency” means: an
(A) An emergency in which human life or health is
imminently endangered; or
(B) A state of disaster emergency declared under § 12-75-
107.




*JLL153*
01/30/2025 4:33:56 PM JLL153